Utah statutes.
63M-1-3306.   Report to legislative committees.

Before November 1 of each year, the director shall submit an annual report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee and the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee.



Enacted by Chapter 25, 2013 General Session

